Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-595
Litter; duty to remove.

Each railroad shall be responsible for the removal of all litter as defined in section 28-523 on property owned or leased by the railroad which is under a bridge, trestle, or similar structure.

Laws 1979, LB 42, § 11;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 11.